Kentucky statutes. TITLE LI Unified Juvenile Code
CHAPTER 625 Termination of Parental Rights

625.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

625.020.
Circuit Court jurisdiction.

The Circuit Court shall have jurisdiction of proceedings under this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 98, effective July 1, 1987.

625.025.
Extension of wardship to age twenty-one.

In the case of a child who has become a ward of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services as a result of a termination of parental rights judgment entered against the child’s parents, and who remains a ward of the cabinet upon attainment of his or her eighteenth birthday, the cabinet, in its discretion, upon request of the ward, may extend its wardship to age twenty-one (21) for the purpose of the child’s participating in state or federal educational programs or to assist the child in establishing independent living arrangements.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 57, § 17, effective March 17, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 668, effective June 20, 2005.

625.030.
Putative father party to proceedings. [Repealed.]